src/fst/morphology/affixes/Der_vv_IV.lexc
LEXICON Der_vv_IV_truncative
+ALLAP+Der/vv:allap IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:allakkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:allakkaluariar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:allaannar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:allaannaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv:allalaar IV-mod_laar ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv:allalaarsinnaa IV-mod_V ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:allalaarsinnaassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv:allannar IV-mod_nar ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:allanna%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ; 
+ALLAP+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv:allangaar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:allangaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv:allangajap k_Exclm_gennemgang ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:allangajakkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:allangajavip IV-mod_iC ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:allangajavikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:allanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:allanngivip IV-mod_iC ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:allanngivikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:allanngivikkalua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv:%TRUNCallannguatsiar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:%TRUNCallannguatsiaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+PALLAP+Der/vv:allappallap IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+PALLAP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:allappallakkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+PALLAP+Der/vv+GUMAAR+Der/vv:allappallakkumaar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+PALLAP+Der/vv+GUMAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:allappallakkumaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:alla%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+QQA+Der/vv:allaqqa flex-iv_voq ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+QQAAR+Der/vv:allaqqaar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+QQAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:allaqqaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+RUJUP+Der/vv:allarujup IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+RUJUP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:allarujukkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+RUJUP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:allarujukkalua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+RUJUP+Der/vv+SUAR+Der/vv:allarujussuar SUAR_gennemgang ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+RUJUP+Der/vv+SUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:allarujussuaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+RUJUP+Der/vv+SUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:allarujussuaralua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:allassima IV-mod_V ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:allassimanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:allassimanngikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:allassimanngikkalua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+TARE+Der/vv:allattar flex-iv_schwa ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:allatsip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:allatse%TRUNCq TV-mod_qe ; 
+ALLAP+Der/vv+UTIGE+Der/vv:allaatig Saq_schwa ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv:allappallaar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:allappallaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:allappallaaralua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:allappallaarsima IV-mod_V ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:allappallaarsimagaluar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:allappallaarsimagalua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:allavip IV-mod_iC ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:allavikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+ALLAP+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:allavikkalua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+ALUP+Der/vv:alup iv_alup ; !flex-iv
+ALUP+Der/vv+SINNAR+Der/vv:alussinnar IV-mod_C ;
+ALUP+Der/vv+SINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:alussinnaraluar IV-mod_C ; 
+ARSUP+Der/vv:arsup IV-mod_C ;
+ARSUP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:arsukkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+ATAAR+Der/vv:ataar IV-mod_C ;
+ATAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ataaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+ATAAR+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:ataavip IV-mod_iC ;
+ATAAR+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ataavikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+ATAAR+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv:ataavinnguatsiar IV-mod_C ;
+ATAAR+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ataavinnguatsiaraluar IV-mod_C ;

+GUSUP+Der/vv:rusup IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusukkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+GI+Der/vv:rusukkaluari XIgujoqX ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:rusukkalua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ; 
+GUSUP+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv:rusukkunnaar IV-mod_iC ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv+Orth/Arch+SIMA+Der/vv:rusugunnaarsima IV-mod_V ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:rusukkunnaartip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:rusukkunnaarsip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:rusuinnar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+LLUAR+Der/vv:rusulluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+LLUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusulluaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv:rusulluinnar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusulluinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+TIGE+Der/vv:rusulluinnartig flex-iv_schwa ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+MISAAR+Der/vv:rusumisaar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+MISAAR+Der/vv+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:rusukumisaar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv:rusunnar IV-mod_nar ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusunnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+GI+Der/vv:rusunnaraluari XIgujoqX ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:rusunnaralua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:rusunnanngi IV-mod_nngit ; !liv 170329
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv:rusunnanngilluinnar IV-mod_C ; !liv 170329
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusunnanngilluinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:rusunna%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ; 
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:rusunnassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusunnassagaluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:rusunnassagalua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ; 
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NAVIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:rusunnavianngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv:rusunniar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusunniaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv:rusunneru IV-mod_V ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusunnerugaluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv:rusunnerugunar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusunnerugunaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv+NIKUU+Der/vv:rusunnerunikuu IV-mod_V ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:rusunnerusima IV-mod_V ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:rusunnerussa IV-mod_ssa ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:rusunngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusunngikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:rusunngikkalua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ; 
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv:rusunngilluinnar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusunngilluinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+RUTTUR+Der/vv:rusunngeruttor IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+RUTTUR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusunngeruttoraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv:rusunnguatsiar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusunnguatsiaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv:rusunnguatsiangaar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusunnguatsiangaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv:rusuppalup IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusuppalukkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+PIAR+Der/vv:rusuppiar IV-mod_C ; !nererusuppiarnanga piss. 20241125 OD
+GUSUP+Der/vv+PIAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:rusuppiassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:ruso%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+QQIP+Der/vv:rusoqqip IV-mod_iC ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+QQIP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusoqqikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+QQIP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:rusoqqikkalua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:rusussima IV-mod_V ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusussimagaluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:rusussimavip IV-mod_iC ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusussimavikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv:rusussinnaa IV-mod_V ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusussinnaagaluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:rususinnaanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:rusussinnaassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:rusussa IV-mod_ssa ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+TSAP+Der/vv:rusutsap IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+TSAP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusutsakkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+TSAP+Der/vv+UMMIR+Der/vv:rusutsaammer IV-mod_iC ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+TSAP+Der/vv+UMMIR+Der/vv+RUJUP+Der/vv:rusutsaammerujup IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+TSAP+Der/vv+UMMIR+Der/vv+RUJUP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusutsaammerujukkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+TSAP+Der/vv+UMMIR+Der/vv+RUJUP+Der/vv+SUAR+Der/vv:rusutsaammerujussuar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+TSAP+Der/vv+UMMIR+Der/vv+RUJUP+Der/vv+SUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusutsaammerujussuaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv:rusuttuar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusuttuaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:rusuttuassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+UMMIR+Der/vv:rusuummer IV-mod_iC ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+UMMIR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusuummeraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+UMMIR+Der/vv+RUJUP+Der/vv:rusuummerujup IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+UMMIR+Der/vv+RUJUP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusuummerujukkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+UMMIR+Der/vv+RUJUP+Der/vv+SUAR+Der/vv:rusuummerujussuar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+UMMIR+Der/vv+RUJUP+Der/vv+SUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusuummerujussuaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv:rusuppallaar IV-mod_C ;
+GUSUP+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusuppallaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+INNAR+Der/vv:innar IV-mod_C ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GALLAR+Der/vv:innarallar gallar-iv ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GALLAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:innarallarsima IV-mod_V ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GALLAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:innarallassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:innaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:innaraluariar IV-mod_C ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+SINNAR+Der/vv:innaraluarsinnar IV-mod_C ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+TARE+Der/vv:innaraluarar flex-iv_schwa ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GUMA+Der/vv:innaruma IV-mod_V ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GUMA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:innarumagaluar IV-mod_C ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GUMA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:innarumagalua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GUMA+Der/vv+NAVIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:innarumanavianngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GUMA+Der/vv+NAVIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:innarumanavianngikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GUMA+Der/vv+NAVIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:innarumanavianngikkalua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GUMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:innarumanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GUMALLIR+Der/vv:innarumaller IV-mod_iC ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GUMAAR+Der/vv:innarumaar IV-mod_C ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GUMAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:innarumaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv:innarunar IV-mod_C ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:innarunaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv:innarunnaar IV-mod_iC ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GUSUP+Der/vv:innarusup IV-mod_C ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GUSUP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:innarusukkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GUSUP+Der/vv+TIGE+Der/vv:innarusutsig flex-iv_schwa ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+GUSUP+Der/vv+TIGE+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:innarusutsigigaluar IV-mod_C ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+JA+Der/vv:innaja flex-iv_voq ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+JA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:innajanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+KANNIR+Der/vv:innakkanner IV-mod_iC ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+KANNIR+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:innakkannersip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+KANNIR+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:innakkannertip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+LLAR+Der/vv:innallar IV-mod_C ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+LLAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:innallaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+INNAR+Der/vv+LLAR+Der/vv+SINNAR+Der/vv:innallarsinnar IV-mod_C ;
